src-fst-morphology-phonology.twolc.md
prääʹzniǩ+N+Sg+Ill: **celebration/juhla**
* *prääʹzniǩ^RmVow^PALNo>a*
* *prääʹzn0k00>a*

* *žẹẹvai^RmVow^I2Zero>ǥa*
* *žẹẹv0000>ǥa*

+Sg+Ill N_HÕʹPPI
* *hõʹppi^UltRmVow>ǥa*
* *hõʹpp00>ǥa*

**Vowel shortening o:0** - used in +Ind+Prs+Pl3, +Ind+Prt+Pl3
šoomm+N+Sg+Ill
* *šoomm^VV2V^VOWRaise>u*
* *šu0mm00>u*
ponjsted+V+Inf
* *poonjâst^Pen^VV2V^RmVow>ed*
* *po0nj0st000>ed*
poorrâd+V+Imprt+Pl3
* *poorr^VV2V^VOWLower>az*
* *på0rr00>az*

ooccâd+V+Imprt+Pl3
* *oocc^VV2V^VOWLower>az*
* *å0cc00>az*

ooumaž+N+Sg+Nom
* *o^1VOWumm^V2VV^YXX2YX>až*
* *ooum000>až*
-o

**Vowel shortening a:0 ** - used in +Ind+Prs+Pl3, +Ind+Prt+Pl3
* *saa{ʹØ}kk^VV2V^PAL>e*
* *sa0ʹǩǩ00>e*

* *maainâst^Pen^VV2V>ed*
* *ma0inâst00>ed*

Aanar+N+Prop+Sg+Ill: **Inari/Enare**
* *Aanar^RmVow>a*
* *Aan0r0>a*

mättʼted+V+Inf: **teach/opettaa**
* *mätta0t^RmVow>ed*
* *mätt0ʼt0>ed*

-a

**Vowel shortening ä:0** - used in +Ind+Prs+Pl3, +Ind+Prt+Pl3

**%{ʼØ%} for modifier letter apostrophe** -
jieʹlli+N+Ess **animal/eläin**
* *jieʹll{ʼØ}i^I2J>en*
* *jieʹllʼj0>en*

* *koll>{ʼØ}j>ed*
* *koll>ʼj>ed*
* ★*koll>{ʼØ}j>ed* (is not standard language)
* ★*koll>0j>ed* (is not standard language)
* *valmštõõll{ʼØ}i^I2J>i*
* *valmštõõllʼj0>i*
piânˈnai+N+Ess: **dog/koira**
* *piânˈn^CCC2CC>{ʼØ}j>en*
* *piân0n0>ʼj>en*
* *jieʹll{ʼØ}i^I2J>e>st*
* *jieʹllʼj0>e>st*

-ä

**Vowel shortening y:0** - used in PX
-y

**Vowel shortening ö:0** - used in PX
-ö

**ZERO to syllable mark 0:ʼ, same as modifier letter apostrophe** - used in zeeʹtt+N+Sg+Abe: zeeʹttʼtää
mättʼted+V+Inf: **teach/opettaa**
* *mätta0t^RmVow>ed*
* *mätt0ʼt0>ed*
pueʹtted+V+Der/jed+Der/Caus+Der/NomAct+N+Ess:
* *puä{ʹØ}tt^CC2CCC>a0t^RmVow>em^RmVow>en*
* *puä0tt0>0ʼt0>0m0>en*
* ★*puä{ʹØ}tt^CC2CCC>at^RmVow>em^RmVow>en* (is not standard language)
* ★*puä0tt0>0t0>0m0>en* (is not standard language)
tåpsʼsted+V+Inf:
* *tååpsa0st^Pen^VV2V^RmVow^PALK>ed*
* *tå0ps0ʼst0000>ed*

* *ijss>0sa*
* *ijss>ʼsa*

* *kåčč>0čem*
* *kåčč>ʼčem*

* *a^1VOWutt^V2VV^YXX2YX>0taa*
* *aaut000>ʼtaa*

* *taaurõ^1VOWš{XC}^C2CC>0ses*
* *taaurõ0šš0>ʼses*

## Vowel alternation rules

### VOWEL SHIFT

### RAISING
deriving +Ind+Prt+Sg1, +Ind+Prt+Sg2 +Ind+Prt+Pl3 in teevvad:tivvu

**Vowel raising o:u** - Adding +Prt+Pl3 for ed verbs, Removing u: and i:  second element due to njeiddad njeiddu
* *šoomm^VV2V^VOWRaise>u*
* *šu0mm00>u*

**Vowel raising %{õu%}:u** - Adding
tõlvvad+V+Pass+PrfPrc: 
* *t{õu}{õuØ}lvv^VOWRaise>um*
* *tu0lvv0>um*

**Vowel raising å:o** - Adding

* *kåbll^VOWRaise*
* *kobll0*

* *kåå{ʹØ}pp^VOWRaise^PAL^CC2C>in*
* *kooʹv0000>in*
* *kå^1VOW{ʹØ}ll^V2VV^VOWRaise^PAL>in*
* *kooʹll000>in*

**Vowel raising e:i** - Adding +Prt+Pl3 for ed verbs, Removing u: and i:  second element due to njeiddad njeiddu

reâugg+N+Sg+Ill
* *reâugg^VOWRaise>u*
* *riõugg0>u*
pieʹhssed+V+Inf: ****
* *peâ{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}ss^PALE^PAL>ed*
* *pieʹh0ss00>ed*
mieʹlǩǩ+N+Sg+Nom: **milk/maito**
* *meâ{ʹØ}lkk^VOWRaise^PALE^PAL*
* *mieʹlǩǩ000*

* *jeä{ʹØ}gˈg^VOWRaise^PALẸ^PAL^CCC2CC*
* *jiẹʹǧ0ǧ0000*
* *beâ{ʹØ}sˈs^VOWRaise^PALE^PAL^CCC2CC*
* *bieʹs0s0000*
* *ceägˈg^VOWRaise>u*
* *ciâgˈg0>u*
cieʹǩǩes+N+Sg+Ill: **trick, type of ear mark/tikki, pykälä**
* *ceä{ʹØ}kˈkes^Pen^PALẸ^Pen^PAL^Pen^CCC2CC*
* *ciẹʹǩ0ǩes000000*

**Vowel raising ẹ:i** - used in
* *pẹ^1VOWss^VOWRaise>u*
* *pi0ss0>u*
* *pẹ^1VOWss^V2VV^VOWRaise>už*
* *piiss00>už*
* *tẹẹvv^VV2V^VOWRaise>uš*
* *ti0vv00>uš*
peigg+N+Sg+Ill
* ★*pẹ^1VOWigg^VOWRaise^VXX2YXX>u* (is not standard language)
* ★*pẹ0jgg00>u* (is not standard language)

**Vowel raising â:õ** - Adding +Prt+Pl3 for ed verbs, Removing u: and i:  second element due to njeiddad njeiddu
mââʹnn+N+Pl+Acc: **egg/muna**
* *mââ{ʹØ}nn^VOWRaise^PAL^CC2C>id*
* *mõõʹn0000>id*
pââʹjj+N+Pl+Gen
* *pââ{ʹØ}jj^VOWRaise^PAL^CC2C>i*
* *põõ0j0000>i*
* ★*pââ{ʹØ}jj^VOWRaise^PAL^CC2C>i* (is not standard language)
* ★*pââ0j0000>i* (is not standard language)
čâʹlmm+N+Pl+Acc: **eye/silmä**
* *čâ^1VOW{ʹØ}lmm^V2VV^VOWRaise^PAL^YXX2YX>id*
* *čõõʹlm00000>id*
kââʹǩǩed+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: **rub/hangata**
* *kââ{ʹØ}kk^VOWRaise^PAL>i*
* *kõõʹǩǩ00>i*
* ★*kââʹǩǩ00>i* (is not standard language)
* *ruâk0k^VOWRaise^CC2CCC>u*
* *ruõkˈk00>u*
* *čuâkˈk^VOWRaise>u*
* *čuõkˈk0>u*
kuâsˈsad+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3
* *kuâsˈs^VOWRaise>u*
* *kuõsˈs0>u*
reâugg+N+Sg+Ill
* *reâugg^VOWRaise>u*
* *riõugg0>u*
veârrad+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3
* *veâr0r^VOWRaise^CC2CCC>u*
* *viõrˈr00>u*
ǩeâikk+N+Sg+Ill: ****
* *ǩeâi{ʹØ}kk^VOWRaise>u*
* *ǩiõi0kk0>u*

**Diphthong raising beginning with u ä:å** -
kuärŋŋad+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3
* *kuärŋŋ^VOWRaise>u*
* *kuårŋŋ0>u*
* ★*kuärŋŋ^VOWRaise>u* (is not standard language)
* ★*kuõrŋŋ0>u* (is not standard language)

**Diphthong raising beginning with e:i ä:â** -
reäkkad+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3
* *reäk0k^VOWRaise^CC2CCC>u*
* *riâkˈk00>u*
ǩeäinn+N+Sg+Ill: **road/tie**
* *ǩeäinn^VOWRaise>u*
* *ǩiâinn0>u*
* ★*ǩeäinn^VOWRaise>u* (is not standard language)
* ★*ǩiäinn0>u* (is not standard language)

**Diphthong raising beginning with e:i ä:e** - used in
* *jeä{ʹØ}kˈkel^Pen^PALE^Pen^PAL^Pen^KKK2ZERO*
* *jeeʹ000el000000*
* *mõõnn^VV2V^CC2CAllegro»škuä{ʹØ}t0t^VOWRaise^PALE^PAL^CC2CCC>iǩ*
* *mõ0n000»škueʹtˈt0000>iǩ*

**Diphthong raising beginning with e:i ä:ẹ** - used in
* *čuä{ʹØ}ckk^PALẸ^PAL^YXX2YX>es*
* *čuẹʹcǩ0000>es*
* *suä{ʹØ}kk^PALẸ^PAL^KK2GG*
* *suẹʹjj000*
vuẹ'ddes+N+Sg+Nom: **root/juuri**
* *vuä{ʹØ}dˈdes^Pen^PALẸ^Pen^PAL^Pen^CCC2CC*
* *vuẹʹd0des000000*

**diphthong backing beginning with u ä:õ** - used in
* *jeä{ʹØ}l0l^VOWRaise^PALÕ^PAL^CC2CCC>e*
* *jiõʹlˈl0000>e*

**Even syllabic verbs I, diphthong raising beginning with ä:a u** - deriving läullad > laullum
* *rääuh^VOWRaise>u*
* *raauh0>u*
* *ä^1VOWldd^VOWRaise>u*
* *a0ldd0>u*
* *ä^1VOWldd^V2VV^VOWRaise^YXX2YX>u*
* *aald0000>u*
čääʹcc+N+Pl+Acc **water**
* *čää{ʹØ}cc^VOWRaise^PAL^KK2GG>id*
* *čaaʹʒʒ000>id*
mäʹhssed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: **pay/maksaa**
* *mä^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}ss^V2VV^VOWRaise^PAL^YXX2VX>i*
* *maa0uʹs00000>i*
* ★*mä^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}ss^V2VV^VOWRaise^PAL^YXX2VX>i* (is not standard language)
* ★*mää0uʹs00000>i* (is not standard language)
mäʹhssed+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: **pay/maksaa**
* *mä^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}ss^VOWRaise^PAL>e*
* *ma0ʹh0ss00>e*
* ★*mä^1VOW{ʹØ%}h%{ʹØ%}ss^VOWRaise^PAL>e* (is not standard language)
* ★*mä0ʹh0ss00>e* (is not standard language)
### LOWERING

**Even syllabic verbs I, vowel lowering o:å** - deriving +Ind+Prs+Sg3, +Ind+Prs+Pl3 in poorrâd
poorrâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3 **eat/syödä**
* *poo{ʹØ}rr^VV2V^VOWLower^PAL>e*
* *på0ʹrr000>e*
poorrâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3 **eat/syödä**
* *poo{ʹØ}rr^VOWLower*
* *påå0rr0*
juʹrdded+V+Cond+Sg1: joordčem
juʹrdded > joordam

**Even syllabic verbs I, vowel lowering i:e** -
viǯǯâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3 **fetch/noutaa**
* *vi^1VOW0ǯǯ^VOWLower^PAL>e!*
* *ve0ʹǯǯ00>e*
viikkâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3
* *vii0kk^VV2V^VOWLower^PAL>e*
* *ve0ʹǩǩ000>e*

siõrrâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: **play/leikkiä**
* *siõ0r0r^VOWLower^PALÄ^PAL^CC2CCC>e*
* *seäʹrˈr0000>e*
* *siõrr^VOWLower*
* *seârr0*
* ★*siõrr^VOWLower* (is not standard language)
* ★*siârr0* (is not standard language)

cieʹǩǩes+N+Sg+Gen: **trick, type of ear mark/tikki, pykälä**
* *ciâkˈkes^Pen^VOWLower^PenVow2a^VC*
* *ceäkˈkaz0000*

**Even syllabic verbs I, vowel lowering i:ẹ ** - deriving +Ind+Prs+Sg3 in viǯǯâd
viǯǯâd+V+Imprt+Sg2 **fetch/noutaa**
* *vi^1VOWǯǯ^V2VV^VOWLower>as*
* *vẹẹǯǯ00>as*
viikkâd+V+Imprt+Pl3
* *viikk^VV2V^VOWLower>az*
* *vẹ0kk00>az*

**Vowel lowering a:ä** -

mään+N+Sg+Nom: **moon/kuu**
* *ma^1VOWnn^V2VV^VOWLower^CC2C*
* *mään0000*
* ★*ma^1VOWnn^V2VV^VOWLower^CC2C* (is not standard language)
* ★*maan0000* (is not standard language)
* *ka^1VOW{ʹØ}gg^VOWLower^PAL^PALK>e*
* *kä0ʹǧǧ000>e*

**Even syllabic verbs I, vowel lowering u:o** - deriving +Ind+Prs+Sg3, +Ind+Prs+Pl3 in uʹvdded

uʹvdded+V+Cond+Pl3 **to give**
* *u^1VOWvdd^V2VV^VOWLower^YXX2VX>če*
* *ooud0000>če*
uʹvdded+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3
* *u^1VOWvdd^VOWLower^YXX2VXX*
* *o0udd00*
vuʹvll+N+Sg+Ill: voulla
* *vu^1VOWvll^VOWLower^YXX2VXX>a!*
* *vo0ull00>a*
puʹhtted+V+Cond+Pl3 **to give**
* *pu^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}tt^VOWLower*
* *po00h0tt0*

kuullâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3 **hear/kuulla**
* *kuu0ll^VV2V^VOWLower^PAL^CC2C>e*
* *ko0ʹl00000>e*
juʹrdded+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1 **think**
* *ju^1VOW{ʹØ}rdd^V2VV^VOWLower^YXX2YX>am*
* *joo0rd0000>am*
juʹrdded+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3 **think**
* *ju^1VOW0rdd^VOWLower^PAL>e*
* *jo0ʹrdd00>e*

stuuʹl+N+Sg+Ill: **chair/tuoli**
* *stu^1VOW{VU}l^V2VV^VOWLower>a*
* *stooul00>a*
juʹrdded+V+Cond+Sg1: joordčem
juʹrdded > joordam

puuʹttes+A+Sg+Gen: **bright/kirkas**
* *pu^1VOWttes^Pen^VOWLower^PenVow2a^VC*
* *po0ttaz0000*
* ★*pu^1VOWttes^Pen^VOWLower^PenVow2a^VC* (is not standard language)
* ★*pu0ttaz0000* (is not standard language)

suukkâd+V+Imprt+Sg3: **row/soutaa**
* *suukk^VOWLower^KK2GG>as*
* *sooǥǥ00>as*

**Even syllabic verbs I, vowel lowering u:õ ** - deriving
* *ču^1VOWkk^V2VV^U2Õ>až*
* *čõõkk00>až*

**Even syllabic verbs I, vowel lowering õ:â ** - deriving +Ind+Prs+Sg3, +Ind+Prs+Pl3 in viǯǯâd
riõkkâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3 **to whip**
* *riõkˈk^VOWLower#*
* *reâkˈk0#*
* *mõõ0nn^VV2V^VOWLower^PAL>e*
* *mâ0ʹnn000>e*
* *mõõnn^VOWLower^CC2C>as*
* *mâân000>as*
võõidâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3:
* *võõi{ʹØ}d^VOWLower*
* *vââi0d0*

vââid+N+Sg+Nom: ****
* *võ^1VOWidd^V2VV^VOWLower^YXX2YX*
* *vââid0000*
kuõskkâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3
* *kuõskk^VOWLower*
* *kuâskk0*
juõiggâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3
* *kuõigg^VOWLower*
* *kuâigg0*

### Diphthongs

**Even syllabic verbs I, diphthong opening after u å:ä** - deriving +Ind+Prs+Sg3, in kuåccâd kuäʹcce
= a>ä lowering clockwise
* *kuå0c0c^VOWLower^PAL^CC2CCC>e*
* *kuäʹcˈc000>e*
puäj+N+Sg+Nom
* *puåjˈj^VOWLower^CCC2C*
* *puåj0000*
* ★*puåjˈj^VOWLower^CCC2C* (is not standard language)
* ★*puäj0j00* (is not standard language)

**Vowel in second syllable e:a** - deriving cieʹǩǩes+N+Sg+Gen: ceäkˈkaz
cieʹǩǩes+N+Sg+Gen: **trick, type of ear mark/tikki, pykälä**
* *ciâkˈkes^Pen^VOWLower^PenVow2a^VC*
* *ceäkˈkaz0000*
puuʹttes+A+Sg+Gen

**Even syllabic verbs I, diphthong opening i:e â:ä for â:ä ** - deriving +Ind+Prs+Sg3, in čiõkkâd
* *vuâinn^VOWLower*
* *vuäinn0*
vueʹlǧǧed+Use/NG+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3 **leave/lähteä**
* *vuâ0lgg^PALÄ^PAL>a*
* *vuäʹlǧǧ00>a*
tieʹtted+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3 **know/tietää**
* *teâ{ʹØ}tˈt^PALÄ^PAL^CC2CCC>e*
* *teäʹtˈt000>e*

**Even syllabic verbs I, diphthong opening after i:e e:â** - deriving +Ind+Prs+Sg3, in pi%{EÂ%}ʹǩǩ:peâkka

### Vowel backing

** u å:õ** - used in
= a>ä lowering clockwise

* *puått^VOWRaise>u*
* *puõtt0>u*

### Vowel Palatalization
**diphthong allophonic realization in palatalization u å:e** - deriving e from å

* *puå0v0v^PALE^PAL^CC2CCC>e*
* *pueʹvˈv000>e*

**diphthong allophonic realization in palatalization u å:ẹ** - deriving

### Vowel Lowering and Fronting

**Even syllabic verbs I, diphthong opening õ:ä after i:e** - deriving +Ind+Prs+Sg3, in čiõkkâd
siõrrâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: **play/leikkiä**
* *siõ0r0r^VOWLower^PALÄ^PAL^CC2CCC>e*
* *seäʹrˈr0000>e*

### SECONDARY FRONTING

**Even syllabic verbs I, secondary vowel fronting with PAL u õ:e** - deriving +Ind+Prs+Pl3 in VIQQAD: kuõskkâd >kueʹsǩǩe

* *kuõ0skk^VOWLower^PALE^PAL>e*
* *kueʹsǩǩ000>e*

**Even syllabic verbs I, secondary u > v **

### RELATIVE VOWEL LENGTHENING

vowel lengthening and consonant shortening, %^Pen: %^V2VV 

**Even syllabic verbs I, relative vowel lengthening %^1VOW:â** - deriving +V+Inf in TIETTED: uudd > uʹvdded
šõddâd+V+Imprt+Sg3:
* *šõ^1VOWdd^V2VV^VOWLower>as*
* *šââdd00>as*

nââʹer+N+Sg+Nom **sleep**
* *nâ^1VOW0kker^Pen^V2VV^Pen^PAL^Pen^KK2ZERO*
* *nââʹ00er000000*

ǩeʹdd+N+Sg+Ill: __field/kenttä__
* *ǩe^1VOW{ʹØ}d0d^PALÂ^PALNo*
* *ǩeâ0dˈd00*
radio+N+Sg+Ill
* *radio^1VOW^V2VVʹje*
* *radioo0ʹje*

**%^1VOW:ẹ relative vowel lengthening** -
sẹẹr+N+Pl+Nom: ****
* *sẹ^1VOWrr^CC2C*
* *sẹẹr00*
pess+N+Sg+Acc: **rifle/pyssy**
* *pẹ^1VOWss^V2VV*
* *pẹẹss0*
veʹrǧǧ+N+Der/lazh+A+Sg+Nom
* *vẹ^1VOW{ʹØ}rgg^V2VV^YXX2YX>laž*
* *vẹẹ0rǥ000>laž*
čẹẹuʹres+N+Sg+Nom = otter
* *čẹ^1VOWu{ʹØ}rres^Pen^V2VV^Pen^PAL^Pen^YXX2YX*
* *čẹẹuʹr0es000000*
viǯǯâd+V+Imprt+Sg2 **fetch/noutaa**
* *vi^1VOWǯǯ^V2VV^VOWLower>as*
* *vẹẹǯǯ00>as*
eelas+N+Sg+Nom:
* *ẹ^1VOWllas^Pen^V2VV^Pen^CC2C*
* *ẹẹl0as0000*
